lexc/tbf.lexc
!***** tbf.lexc *****
! Th. Fransen, 18/08/19
! A selection of nouns, proper names, function words as well as defective "ol" taken from Táin Bó Fraích (Meid 1974)


!\\\\\ DECLARE MULTICHAR SYMBOLS /////

Multichar_Symbols

! *UPPER symbols (Tags)*

+1P
+2P
+3P
+ACC
+ADV
+ART
+ACC
+CONJUNCTION
+DAT
+DEFECT
+FEM
+GEN
+H
+LEN
+MASC
+NAS
+NEUT
+NOM
+NOUN
+PART
+PL
+POSS
+PREP
+PRON
+PROP
+SG
+TEMP
+VERB
+VOC

!\\\\\ BEGIN CONTINUATION CLASSES /////

!*** Root = start ***

LEXICON Root
	Conjunction;
	Article;
	Preposition;
	Proper;
	Particle;
	possPronoun;
	Noun;
	Adverb;
	Verb;

LEXICON Conjunction
ocus+CONJUNCTION:&		#;

LEXICON Article
a+ART+NEUT+SG+ACC+NAS:a		#;
a+ART+NEUT+SG+NOM+NAS:a		#;
in+ART:in					#;
in+ART+FEM+GEN+SG:na		#;
in+ART+GEN+PL:na			#;

LEXICON Preposition
a+PREP+DAT:a						#;
a+PREP+DAT+PRON+3P+SG+NEUT:ass		#;
do+PREP+LEN:do						#;
i+PREP+NAS:i						#;

LEXICON Proper
Aillil+PROP+NOUN+SG+GEN:Ailella			#;
Aillil+PROP+NOUN+SG+ACC:Ailill			#;
Aillil+PROP+NOUN+SG+DAT:Aillil			#;
Aillil+PROP+NOUN+SG+NOM:Ailill			#;
Boind+PROP+NOUN+SG+ACC:Bóind			#;
Boind+PROP+NOUN+SG+DAT:Boind			#;
Boind+PROP+NOUN+SG+NOM:Boind			#;
Boind+PROP+NOUN+SG+GEN:Bóinni			#;
Cernach+PROP+NOUN+ACC:Cernach			#;
Cernach+PROP+NOUN+NOM:Cernach			#;
Cernach+PROP+NOUN+GEN:Chernaig			#;
Conall+PROP+NOUN+GEN:Conaill			#;
Conall+PROP+NOUN+ACC:Conall				#;
Conall+PROP+NOUN+NOM:Conall				#;
Findabair+PROP+NOUN+ACC:Findabair		#;
Findabair+PROP+NOUN+DAT:Findabair		#;
Findabair+PROP+NOUN+NOM:Findabair		#;
Findabair+PROP+NOUN+ACC:Finndabair		#;
Findabair+PROP+NOUN+DAT:Finndabair		#;
Findabair+PROP+NOUN+NOM:Finndabair		#;
Fróech+PROP+NOUN+SG+NOM:Fráech			#;
Fróech+PROP+NOUN+SG+GEN:Fraích			#;
Fróech+PROP+NOUN+SG+ACC:Fróech			#;
Fróech+PROP+NOUN+SG+NOM:Fróech			#;
Ériu+GEN:Hérenn							#;
Ériu+NOM:Hériu							#;
Medb+PROP+NOUN+GEN:Medba				#;
Medb+PROP+NOUN+NOM:Medb					#;
Medb+PROP+NOUN+VOC:Medb					#;
Medb+PROP+NOUN+ACC:Meidb				#;
Medb+PROP+NOUN+DAT:Meidb				#;
Fidach?+PROP+NOUN+GEN:Idaith 			#;

LEXICON Particle
PART+VOC+LEN:a	#;

LEXICON possPronoun
do+POSS+PRON+2P+SG+LEN:do			#;
PRON+POSS+3P+SG+MASC+GEN+LEN:a		#;
PRON+POSS+3P+SG+MASC+LEN:a			#;
PRON+POSS+3P+SG+FEM+GEN+H:a			#;
PRON+POSS+3P+SG+FEM+H:a				#;
PRON+POSS+3P+SG+NEUT+GEN+LEN:a		#;
PRON+POSS+3P+SG+NEUT+LEN:a			#;
PRON+POSS+3P+PL+GEN+NAS:a			#;
PRON+POSS+3P+PL+NAS:a				#;

LEXICON Noun
bó+NOUN+PL+GEN:bó		#;
bó+NOUN+SG+NOM:bó		#;
macc+PL+ACC:maccu		#;
macc+PL+GEN:mac			#;
macc+SG+NOM:mac			#;
macc+PL+NOM:maicc		#;
macc+SG+GEN:maicc		#;	
macc+SG+GEN:maic		#;
macc+PL+NOM:meicc		#;
táin+NOUN+SG+NOM:táin	#;

LEXICON Adverb
íarum+ADV+TEMP:íarum	#;

LEXICON Verb
ol+VERB+DEFECT:ol	#;
